District of Columbia statutes.
49-1101.18

Severability and construction.

(a)

The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the compact shall be enforceable.

(b)

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

(c)

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prohibit the applicability of other interstate compacts to which the states are members.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-304, § 19, 60 DCR 2717